Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5138.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-139.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Rhode Island Lobbying
Reform Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-139.1-14. Prohibited contributions by lobbyists.
No lobbyist, governed by this chapter, shall make any political contributions to any
member of the general assembly in any year during the period from January 1 through July 1, unless
the general assembly has adjourned its business for the year prior to July 1 of the session year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000112
========